Nebraska, session 109, LB1144.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1144 LB1144
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-927, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
68-927 For purposes of sections 68-926 to 68-933:
(1) Coordinate benefits means:
(a) Provide to the department information regarding the licensed
insurer's or self-funded insurer's existing coverage for an individual
who is eligible for a state benefit program; and
(b) Meet payment obligations;
(2) Coverage information means health information possessed by a
licensed insurer or self-funded insurer that is limited to the following
information about an individual:
(a) Eligibility for coverage under a health plan;
(b) Coverage of health care under the health plan; or
(c) Benefits and payments associated with the health plan;
(3) Health plan means any policy of insurance issued by a licensed
insurer or any employee benefit plan offered by a self-funded insurer
that provides for payment to, or on behalf of, an individual as a result
of an illness, disability, or injury or change in a health condition and
includes a service benefit plan, managed care organization, pharmacy
benefit manager, or another party that is legally responsible by law,
contract, or agreement for payment of a claim for a health care item or
service;
(4) Individual means a person covered by a state benefit program,
including the medical assistance program, or a person applying for such
coverage;
(5) Licensed insurer means any insurer, except a self-funded
insurer, including a fraternal benefit society, producer, or other person
licensed or required to be licensed, authorized or required to be
authorized, or registered or required to be registered pursuant to the
insurance laws of the state; and
(6) Self-funded insurer means any employer or union who or which
-2-

LB1144 LB1144
2026 2026
provides a self-funded employee benefit plan.
Sec. 2. Section 68-928, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
68-928 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at
the request of the department, a licensed insurer or a self-funded
insurer shall provide coverage information to the department without an
individual's authorization for purposes of:
(a) Determining an individual's eligibility for state benefit
programs, including the medical assistance program; or
(b) Coordinating benefits with state benefit programs.
Such information shall be provided within thirty days after the date
of request unless good cause is shown. Requests for coverage information
shall specify individual recipients for whom information is being
requested.
(2)(a) Coverage information requested pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section regarding a limited benefit policy shall be limited to
whether a specified individual has coverage and, if so, a description of
that coverage, and such information shall be used solely for the purposes
of subdivision (1)(a) of this section.
(b) For purposes of this section, limited benefit policy means a
policy of insurance issued by a licensed insurer that consists only of
one or more, or any combination of the following:
(i) Coverage only for accident or disability income insurance, or
any combination thereof;
(ii) Coverage for specified disease or illness; or
(iii) Hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity insurance.
(3) An entity that issues a health plan shall:
(a) Respond to a request by the department regarding a claim for
payment for a health care item or service submitted not later than three
years after the date of the provision of such health care item or
service; and
-3-

LB1144 LB1144
2026 2026
(b) Not deny a claim submitted by the department solely on the basis
of the date of submission, the type or format of the claim form, or a
failure to present proper documentation at the point-of-sale, if (i) the
claim is submitted by the department within the three-year period
beginning on the date that the health care item or service was provided,
and (ii) an action by the department to enforce its rights with respect
to such claim is commenced within six years after the date of the claim's
submission. Such information shall be provided to the department within
thirty days after the date of its request unless good cause is shown. A
request for coverage information shall specify the individual for whom
information is being requested.
Sec. 3. Original sections 68-927 and 68-928, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-4-